District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2602.13

Single annual license fee.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 4, 1922, 42 Stat. 408, ch. 93, title V, § 13
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(hh), 46 DCR 3142
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(b), 50 DCR 330

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 35-1413.
1973 Ed., § 35-1113.

Editor's Notes

Office of Collector of Taxes abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2602.09.